Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-1513. Status as a registered sex offender.

The General Assembly finds that:

The fact that a person is a registered sex offender or is required to register as a sex offender is releasable to employers and licensing boards;

Certain agencies are mandated to perform background checks on persons who work with children, elderly persons, and individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities;

The offenses for which an agency may exclude a person from employment are outlined in Arkansas law, but being a registered sex offender or being required to register as a sex offender is not listed as a disqualification;

It is a primary government interest to protect the public against sex offenders. A registered sex offender poses a higher risk of reoffending; therefore, release of certain information will assist in protecting the safety of the public;

Protection of the safety of the public will be increased by allowing agencies to immediately take the actions or precautions they deem necessary before employing or licensing the registrant or after employment or licensing of the registrant including, but not limited to, termination of employment or revocation of license;

The provisions of this section are civil in nature and for the protection of the public; and

It is the intent of this section that being a registered sex offender as a result of a court order or that being required to register as a sex offender as a result of a court order may exclude a person from employment or licensure with agencies and boards that are mandated by Arkansas law to perform criminal history background checks.

Whenever a noncriminal justice criminal history background check is performed on a person under the provisions of any criminal background check requirement contained in the Arkansas Code for employment, licensure, or any other purpose, the person may be disqualified for employment, licensure, or any other purpose for which the background check was conducted if it is determined that a court has entered an order requiring the person to register as a sex offender.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities” for “developmentally disabled persons” in (a)(2).

Cross References. Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, §12-12-901 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 2: Apr. 6, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the dissemination of complete, accurate, and timely criminal background check information for volunteers is necessary for the protection of children, the elderly, and developmentally disabled persons in the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 575, § 3: Apr. 2, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas public school students and their parents or guardians should be confident that any person who is allowed to volunteer at a school district or an education service cooperative does not have a criminal record and is not a potential threat to the safety of children; and that this act is immediately necessary to afford additional protection to school children from all persons in school districts or education service cooperatives who might sexually, physically, or emotionally abuse students entrusted into their care. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1941, § 1; 2019, No. 1035, § 8.

Subchapter 16

— Criminal History for Volunteers Act

12-12-1601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal History for Volunteers Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1602. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to allow volunteer organizations to request and receive information regarding the qualifications of an individual who volunteers his or her time or services to work with children, the elderly, victims of domestic abuse, or individuals with disabilities based upon the individual's state and federal criminal history.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1603. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Children” means individuals under sixteen (16) years of age;

“Conviction” means that an individual has been found guilty of or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any offense by any court in the State of Arkansas or of any similar offense by a court in another state or a federal court regardless of whether the conviction has been sealed or expunged;

“Criminal history information” means a record compiled by the Arkansas Crime Information Center or the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police on an individual;

“Domestic abuse” means the same as defined in § 9-4-102;

“Elderly” means individuals sixty-five (65) years of age or older;

“Employee” means an individual currently in the service of an employer for full-time or part-time compensation and employed by contract or at will, in which the employer has the authority to control the individual in the material details of how work shall be performed and when compensation shall be provided;

“Individuals with disabilities” means individuals with mental illness or intellectual or other developmental disabilities or with physical or mental impairments that substantially limit one (1) or more of the major life activities of the individual;

“Volunteer” means an individual who provides services involving contact with children, the elderly, victims of domestic abuse, or individuals with disabilities without an express or implied promise of compensation; and

“Volunteer organization” means an individual, group of individuals, association, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or partnership, business, public school, school district, person or organization designated by a public school or school district to organize volunteers for the public school or school district, or other entity that has volunteers who provide services to children, the elderly, victims of domestic abuse, or individuals with disabilities.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “victims of domestic abuse” in (8).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (9).

The 2019 amendment substituted “individuals with mental illness or intellectual or other developmental disabilities or” for “mentally ill or developmentally disabled individuals” in (7).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1; 2011, No. 779, § 12; 2013, No. 575, § 1; 2019, No. 1035, § 9.

12-12-1604. Authority.

The Department of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center may provide background check services to a volunteer organization pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

The department and the center may promulgate rules to administer the provisions of this subchapter.

If the volunteer organization desires to receive criminal background check information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the volunteer organization shall include a copy of the minutes from its most recent board meeting that lists offenses that the volunteer organization considers to disqualify an applicant to volunteer from serving as a volunteer with the volunteer organization.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1605. Registration by volunteer organization.

A volunteer organization desiring to obtain criminal background check information on volunteers shall register with the Department of Arkansas State Police.

The department may promulgate rules regarding registration with the department to obtain criminal background check information.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1606. Request for criminal background check.

(1)Any volunteer organization registered to obtain criminal background check information from the Arkansas Crime Information Center or the Federal Bureau of Investigation concerning volunteers may apply to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police for the purpose of obtaining criminal history information regarding any individual currently acting as a volunteer with the volunteer organization or desiring to act as a volunteer with the volunteer organization.

The request form submitted by the volunteer organization shall include:

The name of the volunteer organization;

The identifying information of the individual for whom the background check is sought; and

A signed authorization form executed by the volunteer authorizing the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police to release criminal history information.

The request form shall be subject to inspection by the Department of Arkansas State Police.

The volunteer organization shall retain a copy of the criminal background check request for a period of at least three (3) years from the date of the request.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1607. Background checks.

(1)Upon receipt of a proper request from a volunteer organization, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall conduct a background check through the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

(A)The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall provide the information obtained from the Arkansas background check to the volunteer organization.

The information shall include:

All pending Arkansas felony arrests;

All Arkansas criminal convictions; and

Whether the individual is a registered sex offender or required to register as a sex offender.

(1)Upon the completion of the Arkansas background check, the volunteer organization may request through the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police a national criminal background check through the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The volunteer organization shall not be required to submit an additional application for the state and national criminal background check through the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The national background check shall comply with federal standards in effect as of January 1, 2005, including, but not limited to, standards concerning the requirement of the submission of the fingerprints of the volunteer.

The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall not release the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history report to the volunteer organization but shall review the report and the criteria provided by the volunteer organization in its registration to obtain criminal background check information on volunteers and notify the volunteer organization whether the volunteer meets the qualifications for serving as a volunteer with the organization.

A volunteer organization shall consider all information received in response to a request for criminal background information confidential.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1608. Penalty.

The following acts are a Class A misdemeanor:

Knowingly releasing or disclosing criminal history information to any unauthorized volunteer organization or person; or

Obtaining criminal history information for a purpose not authorized by this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “criminal history” for “criminal background” in (1); and inserted “criminal history” in (2).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1; 2011, No. 779, § 13.

12-12-1609. Fees.

The Department of Arkansas State Police may charge a fee for providing criminal history background checks under this subchapter.

The amount of the fee for a criminal history background check conducted through the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall be determined jointly by the department and the center and shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00), exclusive of any third-party electronic processing fee charges.

The amount of the fee for a criminal history background check performed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall not exceed the amount determined by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Fees collected pursuant to this subchapter shall be credited as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) to the Crime Information System Fund; and

Fifty percent (50%) to the State Police Equipment Fund, to be used for the continued operation and expansion of the automated criminal history system and the automated fingerprint identification system.

A request for information, supporting documents, and any response to a request for criminal background check information under this subchapter shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 967, § 3: Apr. 12, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that currently each finding of abuse or neglect by the Department of Human Services is subject to challenge unless the department sends a person to conduct an investigation in person; that the department's review and adoption of the maltreatment investigation record submitted by a nursing home, a practice in place for decades, was determined to be out of compliance; and that this act is immediately necessary because this act would correct that situation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

12-12-1610. Extent of disclosure.

The Department of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall disseminate criminal history information to the extent entries have been made at the time of the request for the information.

Any event, activity, or any portion of the criminal history information that has not been processed by the department or the center shall not be required to be included in the dissemination.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1778, § 1.

Subchapter 17

— Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Act

12-12-1701. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1702. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to:

Provide a system for the reporting of known or suspected adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment;

Ensure the screening, safety assessment, and prompt investigation of reports of known or suspected adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment;

Provide for a civil action, if appropriate, to protect maltreated adults and long-term care facility residents; and

Encourage the cooperation of state law enforcement officials, courts, and state agencies in the investigation and assessment of maltreated adults and long-term care facility residents, and prosecution of offenders.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “investigation, and assessment of maltreated adults and long-term care facility residents and prosecution of offenders” for “investigation, assessment, and prosecution of maltreated adults and long-term care facility residents” in (4).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2007, No. 283, § 6.

12-12-1703. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Abuse” means with regard to any long-term care facility resident or any patient at the Arkansas State Hospital by a caregiver:

Any intentional and unnecessary physical act that inflicts pain on or causes injury to an endangered person or an impaired person, excluding court-ordered medical care or medical care requested by the patient or long-term care facility resident or a person legally authorized to make medical decisions on behalf of the patient or long-term care facility resident;

Any intentional act that a reasonable person would believe subjects an endangered person or an impaired person, regardless of age, ability to comprehend, or disability, to ridicule or psychological injury in a manner likely to provoke fear or alarm, excluding necessary care and treatment provided in accordance with generally recognized professional standards of care;

Any intentional threat that a reasonable person would find credible and nonfrivolous to inflict pain on or cause injury to an endangered person or an impaired person except in the course of medical treatment or for justifiable cause; or

Any willful infliction of injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment with resulting physical harm, pain, or mental anguish.

“Abuse” means with regard to any person who is not a long-term care facility resident or a patient at the Arkansas State Hospital:

Any intentional and unnecessary physical act that inflicts pain on or causes injury to an endangered person or an impaired person;

Any intentional act that a reasonable person would believe subjects an endangered person or an impaired person, regardless of age, ability to comprehend, or disability, to ridicule or psychological injury in a manner likely to provoke fear or alarm; or

Any intentional threat that a reasonable person would find credible and nonfrivolous to inflict pain on or cause injury to an endangered person or an impaired person except in the course of medical treatment or for justifiable cause;

“Adult maltreatment” means abuse, exploitation, neglect, or sexual abuse of an adult;

“Caregiver” means any of the following that has the responsibility for the protection, care, or custody of an endangered person or an impaired person as a result of assuming the responsibility voluntarily, by contract, through employment, or by order of a court:

A related person or an unrelated person;

An owner, an agent, or a high managerial agent of a public or private organization; or

A public or private organization;

“Department” means the Department of Human Services;

“Endangered person” means:

A person eighteen (18) years of age or older who:

Is found to be in a situation or condition that poses a danger to himself or herself; and

Demonstrates a lack of capacity to comprehend the nature and consequences of remaining in that situation or condition; or

A long-term care facility resident or an Arkansas State Hospital resident who:

Is found to be in a situation or condition that poses an imminent risk of death or serious bodily harm to the long-term care facility resident; and

Demonstrates a lack of capacity to comprehend the nature and consequences of remaining in that situation or condition;

“Exploitation” means the:

Illegal or unauthorized use or management of an endangered person's or an impaired person's funds, assets, or property;

Use of an adult endangered person's or an adult impaired person's power of attorney or guardianship for the profit or advantage of one's own self or another;

The fraudulent or otherwise illegal, unauthorized, or improper act or process of a person, including a caregiver or fiduciary, that uses the resources of an endangered person, impaired person, or long-term care facility resident for monetary or personal benefit, profit, or gain, or that results in depriving the endangered person, impaired person, or long-term care facility resident of rightful access to or use of benefits, resources, belongings, or assets; or

Misappropriation of property of a long-term care facility resident, that is, the deliberate misplacement, exploitation, or wrongful, temporary, or permanent use of a long-term care facility resident's belongings or money without the long-term care facility resident's consent;

“Fiduciary” means a person or entity with the legal responsibility to:

Make decisions on behalf of and for the benefit of another person; and

Act in good faith and with fairness.

“Fiduciary” includes without limitation:

A trustee;

A guardian;

A conservator;

An executor;

An agent under financial power of attorney or healthcare power of attorney; or

A representative payee;

“Imminent danger to health or safety” means a situation in which death or serious bodily harm could reasonably be expected to occur without intervention;

“Impaired person” means a person:

Eighteen (18) years of age or older who as a result of mental or physical impairment is unable to protect himself or herself from abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, or exploitation; or

Who is a long-term care facility resident and who as a result of mental or physical impairment is unable to protect himself or herself from abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

For purposes of this subchapter, a long-term care facility resident is presumed to be an impaired person.

For purposes of this subchapter, a person who has a representative payee appointed for the person by the Social Security Administration or another authorized agency is presumed to be an impaired person in relation to adult maltreatment through financial exploitation;

“Impairment” means a disability that grossly and chronically diminishes a person's physical or mental ability to live independently or provide self-care as determined through observation, diagnosis, evaluation, or assessment;

“Long-term care facility” means:

A nursing home;

A residential care facility;

A post-acute head injury retraining and residential facility;

An assisted living facility;

An intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities; or

Any facility that provides long-term medical or personal care;

“Long-term care facility resident” means a person, regardless of age, living in a long-term care facility;

“Long-term care facility resident maltreatment” means abuse, exploitation, neglect, or sexual abuse of a long-term care facility resident;

“Maltreated adult” means an adult who has been abused, exploited, neglected, physically abused, or sexually abused;

“Maltreated person” means a person, regardless of age, who has been abused, exploited, neglected, physically abused, or sexually abused;

“Neglect” means:

An act or omission by an endangered person or an impaired person, for example, self-neglect; or

An act or omission by a caregiver responsible for the care and supervision of an endangered person or an impaired person constituting:

Negligently failing to provide necessary treatment, rehabilitation, care, food, clothing, shelter, supervision, or medical services to an endangered person or an impaired person;

Negligently failing to report health problems or changes in health problems or changes in the health condition of an endangered person or an impaired person to the appropriate medical personnel;

Negligently failing to carry out a treatment plan developed or implemented by the facility; or

Negligently failing to provide goods or services to a long-term care facility resident necessary to avoid physical harm, mental anguish, or mental illness;

“Negligently” means a person's failure to exercise the degree of care that a person of ordinary prudence would have exercised in the same circumstances;

“Physical injury” means the impairment of a physical condition or the infliction of substantial pain on a person.

If the person is an endangered person or an impaired person, there is a presumption that any physical injury resulted in the infliction of substantial pain;

“Serious bodily harm” means sexual abuse, physical injury, or serious physical injury;

“Serious physical injury” means physical injury to an endangered person or an impaired person that creates a substantial risk of death or that causes protracted disfigurement, protracted impairment of health, or loss or protracted impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ;

“Sexual abuse” means deviate sexual activity, sexual contact, or sexual intercourse, as those terms are defined in § 5-14-101, with another person who is not the actor's spouse and who is incapable of consent because he or she is mentally defective, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless; and

“Subject of the report” means:

The endangered person or impaired person;

The adult's legal guardian;

The natural or legal guardian of a long-term care facility resident under eighteen (18) years of age; and

The offender.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by No, 283 rewrote (1); substituted “serious bodily harm” for “severe bodily injury” in (7); inserted “physically abused” in (13); deleted “as those terms are defined in §5-14-101” at the end of (18); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 497 substituted “a danger to himself or herself” for “an imminent risk of death or serious bodily harm to that person” in (5)(A)(i).

The 2009 amendment by No. 165 redesignated (3) and made stylistic changes; and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in present (15)(B)(iv).

The 2009 amendment by No. 525 inserted (6)(C) and (7), redesignated subdivisions accordingly, and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment inserted “or an Arkansas State Hospital resident” in (5)(B).

The 2013 amendment added (9)(C); and rewrote (15)(B)(iii) and (15)(B)(iv).

The 2015 amendment inserted designation (9)(A)(i); added (9)(A)(ii); and inserted the definition for “Negligently”.

The 2017 amendment added the definition of “Impairment”.

Adult and Long-term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Act is clearly designed for the protection of the impaired person, in this case, the mentally impaired adult.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Pope, 2013 Ark. App. 429, 429 S.W.3d 281 (2013).

Substantial evidence supported the finding of abuse as defined in this section where a witness testified that she heard the elderly resident of the long-term-care facility make a sound like it hurt when the certified nursing assistant yanked her arm and that the resident indicated she was not okay.Snyder v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 473, 559 S.W.3d 771 (2018).

It was the child with the impaired adult, not the impaired adult, who was harmed, and there was no substantial evidence to support the agency's decision that the certified caregiver negligently supervised the adult, especially where it was the third party, the child, and not the impaired adult, who was actually harmed.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Pope, 2013 Ark. App. 429, 429 S.W.3d 281 (2013).

Impaired adult was not left alone with the child unsupervised in a way that constituted negligence, and applying this negligent supervision statute under these circumstances was an abuse of discretion.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Pope, 2013 Ark. App. 429, 429 S.W.3d 281 (2013).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2007, No. 283, § 7; 2007, No. 497, § 4; 2009, No. 165, §§ 9, 10;
2009, No. 525, § 1; 2011, No. 206, § 7; 2013, No. 584, §§ 1, 2; 2015, No. 1214, §§ 3, 4; 2017, No. 579, § 5.

12-12-1704. Spiritual treatment alone not abusive.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to mean that an endangered person or an impaired person who is being furnished with treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by an accredited practitioner of the church or religious denomination is for that reason alone an endangered person or an impaired person.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1705. Privilege not grounds for exclusion of evidence.

Any privilege between husband and wife or between any professional person and his or her clients, except lawyer and client, including, but not limited to, physicians, members of the clergy, counselors, hospitals, clinics, rest homes, and nursing homes shall not constitute grounds for excluding evidence at any proceeding regarding an endangered person or an impaired person, or the cause of the proceeding.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.